Yamls/Pron-kytshom_gt-norm.yaml
    некытшӧм+Pron+Neg+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: некытшӧммезныт
    некытшӧм+Pron+Neg+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: некытшӧммезнытӧ
    некытшӧм+Pron+Neg+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: некытшӧммезнытлӧн
    некытшӧм+Pron+Neg+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: некытшӧммезнытлісь
    некытшӧм+Pron+Neg+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: некытшӧммезнытлӧ
    некытшӧм+Pron+Neg+Pl+Ins+PxPl2: некытшӧммезнаныт 
    некытшӧм+Pron+Neg+Pl+Com+PxPl2: некытшӧммезныткӧт
    некытшӧм+Pron+Neg+Pl+Car+PxPl2: [некытшӧммезныттӧг, некытшӧммезтӧгьяныт]
    некытшӧм+Pron+Neg+Pl+Cns+PxPl2: некытшӧммезнытла
    некытшӧм+Pron+Neg+Pl+Cmpr+PxPl2: некытшӧммезнытся
    некытшӧм+Pron+Neg+Pl+Ine+PxPl2: некытшӧммезаныт
    некытшӧм+Pron+Neg+Pl+Ela+PxPl2: [некытшӧммесиныт, некытшӧммезсиныт]
    некытшӧм+Pron+Neg+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: некытшӧммезаныт
    некытшӧм+Pron+Neg+Pl+Apr+PxPl2: [некытшӧммезнытлань, некытшӧммезланяныт]
    некытшӧм+Pron+Neg+Pl+Egr+PxPl2: [некытшӧммезнытсянь, некытшӧммезсяняныт]
    некытшӧм+Pron+Neg+Pl+Prl+PxPl2: [некытшӧммезӧттяныт, некытшӧммезӧттиныт]
    некытшӧм+Pron+Neg+Pl+TerI+PxPl2: [некытшӧммезӧдззаныт, некытшӧммезӧдззиныт]
    некытшӧм+Pron+Neg+Pl+TerII+PxPl2: некытшӧммезнытви
    некытшӧм+Pron+Neg+Pl+AprIne+PxPl2: [некытшӧммезланяныт, некытшӧммезнытланьын]
    некытшӧм+Pron+Neg+Pl+AprEla+PxPl2: [некытшӧммезланьсиныт, некытшӧммезнытланись]
    некытшӧм+Pron+Neg+Pl+AprIll+PxPl2: [некытшӧммезланяныт, некытшӧммезнытланьӧ]
    некытшӧм+Pron+Neg+Pl+AprEgr+PxPl2: [некытшӧммезнытланьсянь, некытшӧммезланьсяняныт]
    некытшӧм+Pron+Neg+Pl+AprPrl+PxPl2: [некытшӧммезнытланьӧт, некытшӧммезланьӧттяныт, некытшӧммезланьӧттиныт]
    некытшӧм+Pron+Neg+Pl+AprTerI+PxPl2: [некытшӧммезнытланьӧдз, некытшӧммезланьӧдззаныт, некытшӧммезланьӧдззиныт]
    некытшӧм+Pron+Neg+Pl+AprTerII+PxPl2: некытшӧммезнытланьви 


    некытшӧм+Pron+Neg+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: некытшӧммезныс
    некытшӧм+Pron+Neg+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: некытшӧммезнысӧ
    некытшӧм+Pron+Neg+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: некытшӧммезныслӧн
    некытшӧм+Pron+Neg+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: некытшӧммезныслісь
    некытшӧм+Pron+Neg+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: некытшӧммезныслӧ
    некытшӧм+Pron+Neg+Pl+Ins+PxPl3: некытшӧммезнаныс 
    некытшӧм+Pron+Neg+Pl+Com+PxPl3: некытшӧммезныскӧт
    некытшӧм+Pron+Neg+Pl+Car+PxPl3: [некытшӧммезныстӧг, некытшӧммезтӧгьяныс]
    некытшӧм+Pron+Neg+Pl+Cns+PxPl3: некытшӧммезнысла
    некытшӧм+Pron+Neg+Pl+Cmpr+PxPl3: некытшӧммезнысся
    некытшӧм+Pron+Neg+Pl+Ine+PxPl3: некытшӧммезаныс
    некытшӧм+Pron+Neg+Pl+Ela+PxPl3: [некытшӧммесиныс, некытшӧммезсиныс]
    некытшӧм+Pron+Neg+Pl+Ill+PxPl3: некытшӧммезаныс
    некытшӧм+Pron+Neg+Pl+Apr+PxPl3: [некытшӧммезныслань, некытшӧммезланяныс]
    некытшӧм+Pron+Neg+Pl+Egr+PxPl3: [некытшӧммезныссянь, некытшӧммезсяняныс]
    некытшӧм+Pron+Neg+Pl+Prl+PxPl3: [некытшӧммезӧттяныс, некытшӧммезӧттиныс]
    некытшӧм+Pron+Neg+Pl+TerI+PxPl3: [некытшӧммезӧдззаныс, некытшӧммезӧдззиныс]
    некытшӧм+Pron+Neg+Pl+TerII+PxPl3: некытшӧммезнысви
    некытшӧм+Pron+Neg+Pl+AprIne+PxPl3: [некытшӧммезланяныс, некытшӧммезнысланьын]
    некытшӧм+Pron+Neg+Pl+AprEla+PxPl3: [некытшӧммезланьсиныс, некытшӧммезнысланись]
    некытшӧм+Pron+Neg+Pl+AprIll+PxPl3: [некытшӧммезланяныс, некытшӧммезнысланьӧ]
    некытшӧм+Pron+Neg+Pl+AprEgr+PxPl3: [некытшӧммезнысланьсянь, некытшӧммезланьсяняныс]
    некытшӧм+Pron+Neg+Pl+AprPrl+PxPl3: [некытшӧммезнысланьӧт, некытшӧммезланьӧттяныс, некытшӧммезланьӧттиныс]
    некытшӧм+Pron+Neg+Pl+AprTerI+PxPl3: [некытшӧммезнысланьӧдз, некытшӧммезланьӧдззаныс, некытшӧммезланьӧдззиныс]
    некытшӧм+Pron+Neg+Pl+AprTerII+PxPl3: некытшӧммезнысланьви 

   
